Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201449-14,102
Contracts with government bodies;
procedure; powers of certain
cities; purpose.

(1) Except as otherwise provided
by law, no public official or public employee, a member of that individual's
immediate family, or business with which the individual is associated shall
enter into a contract valued at two thousand dollars or more, in any one year,
with a government body unless the contract is awarded through an open and
public process.

(2) For purposes of this section, an open and public process includes
prior public notice and subsequent availability for public inspection during
the regular office hours of the contracting government body of the proposals
considered and the contract awarded.

(3) No contract may be divided for the purpose of evading the requirements
of this section.

(4) This section shall not apply to a contract when the public official
or public employee does not in any way represent either party in the transaction.

(5) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, any city of the metropolitan, primary, or
first class may prohibit contracts over a specific dollar amount in which
a public official or a public employee of such city may have an interest.

(6) This section prohibits
public officials and public employees from engaging in certain activities
under circumstances creating a substantial conflict of interest. This section
is not intended to penalize innocent persons, and a contract shall not be
absolutely void by reason of this section.

(7) This section does
not apply to contracts covered by sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.06.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 102;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 46;

Laws 2014, LB364, § 1.
July 18, 2014